Hawaii statutes.
[§256B-8] Hawaii ABLE savings program trust
fund. (a) There is established the Hawaii ABLE savings program trust fund
within the treasury of the State. The fund shall consist of moneys received
from an ABLE savings program manager, any governmental or private grants, and
any general fund appropriations for the program.

(b) The fund shall be used if the director
elects to accept deposits from contributors, rather than have deposits sent
directly to the program manager. The fund shall consist of any moneys
deposited by contributors in accordance with this chapter which are not
deposited directly with the program manager.

(c) All interest derived from the deposit and
investment of moneys in the savings program trust fund shall be credited to the
fund. At the end of any fiscal year, all unexpended and unencumbered moneys in
the savings program trust fund shall remain in the savings program trust fund
and shall not be credited or transferred to the general fund or any other
funds.

(d) All expenses incurred by the director in
developing and administering the ABLE savings program shall be payable from the
Hawaii ABLE savings program trust fund. [L 2015, c 206, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next